Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-120.02
Telemonitoring, defined.

Telemonitoring means the remote monitoring of a patient's vital signs, biometric data, or subjective data by a monitoring device which transmits such data electronically to a credential holder for analysis and storage.

Laws 2018, LB701, § 4.